Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB221.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13A07(f) of Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 13A07. Prohibited activities.* * *(f) Unlawful acts.--* * *(1.1) A lobbyist may not be appointed, serve or be employed as:(i) A public official or employee of a Commonwealth agency as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions).(ii) A public officer or employee of the Commonwealth government as defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101.123456789101112131415161718 (iii) A member of the Board of Governors of the State System of Higher Education.(iv) A member of the board of trustees of a State-related institution.* * *Section 2. This act shall not apply to a term of appointment, service or employment that commences prior to the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0221PN0170 - 2 - 123456789